Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. Education of Children with Disabilities

Cross references. —

As to services to the preschool handicapped, see article 7 of this chapter.

§ 21-2-501.
Children with disabilities entitled to free and appropriate education.

Every child of school age in the state of Wyoming having a mental, physical or psychological disability which impairs learning, shall be entitled to and shall receive a free and appropriate education in accordance with his capabilities.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 284; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-284; W.S. 1977, §

21-14-101

; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1992, ch. 65, § 1.

No educational services after age 21. —

A county school district is neither entitled nor obligated to provide educational services for individuals within the district after the recipient reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Sykes v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1263,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “EDUCATIONAL LAW — Wyoming Refuses to Recognize Compensatory Education as a Remedy Under the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975. Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988), ” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 529 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of “stay-put” provision of Education of the Handicapped Act (20 USC § 1415(e)(3) [ 20 USC § 1415(k)(7)]), that handicapped child shall remain in current educational placement pending proceedings conducted under section, 103 ALR Fed 120.

Obligation of public educational agencies, under Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 USC §§ 1400 et seq.), to pay tuition costs for students unilaterally placed in private schools — Post-Burlington cases 152 ALR Fed 485.

Who is prevailing party for purposes of obtaining attorney's fees under § 615(i)(3)(B) of Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA)20 USC § 1415(i)(3)(B)153 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes services that must be provided by federally assisted schools under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) (20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.), 161 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes reasonable accommodation under federal statutes protecting rights of disabled individual, as regards educational program or school rules as applied to learning disabled student, 166 ALR Fed 503.

§ 21-2-502.
Duties of school districts; interdistrict contracts; assistance of state superintendent; attendance beyond school age.

Each school district of this state having any school age children residing in the district who possess any of the disabilities covered under this article shall, subject to the rules and regulations of the state superintendent, provide for the appropriate diagnosis, evaluation, education or training and necessary related services and may include, but is not limited to room and board, for those children. If the school district is unable to provide the necessary and appropriate programs and services, it shall contract with another school district or agency to obtain them. If the programs and services cannot reasonably be provided by the district or by interdistrict contracts, the state superintendent shall assist local boards of trustees in arranging for the appropriate educational programs and services either within or without the state pursuant to its rules and regulations and financed as provided by law.

Notwithstanding W.S.

21-2-501

,

21-4-301

, and subsection (a) of this section, any child with a mental, physical or psychological disability receiving programs and services within district facilities who attains the age of twenty-one (21) during any school year shall be provided the opportunity to complete that school year.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 286; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-286; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

21-14-103

; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 2003, ch. 50, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” both times in (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “state superintendent” for “director” twice.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Quoted

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of, and sufficiency of compliance with, state standards for approval of private school to receive public placements of students or reimbursement for their educational costs, 48 ALR4th 1231.

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.

Obligation of public educational agencies, under Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 USC §§ 1400 et seq.), to pay tuition costs for students unilaterally placed in private schools — Post-Burlington cases 152 ALR Fed 485.